Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 1 General Provisions as to Civil Actions
For case note, “Torts — Should a Plaintiff's Intervening Act Be An Absolute Defense Under Comparative Negligence? Buckley v. Bell, 703 P.2d 1089,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1986).

For case note, “Torts — Wyoming Finds an Appropriate Case to Adopt Strict Products Liability. Ogle v. Caterpillar Tractor Co., 716 P.2d 334,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 511

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1987).

For article, “Comparative Negligence and Strict Tort Liability — The Marriage Revisited,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1987).

For article, “Lender Liability in Wyoming,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1991).

For casenote, “Res Ipsa Loquitur — The Wyoming Supreme Court Relaxes the Elements a Plaintiff Needs to Establish Before Invoking the Doctrine. Goedert v. Newcastle Equipment Co., 802 P.2d 157,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1990),” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1992).

For comment, “The Availability of Indemnity in Tort Actions Involving the Wyoming Comparative Negligence Statute—Multiple Parties Cause Multiple Problems,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 253 (1994).

For article, “Wyoming's New Comparative Fault Statute,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1996)

For casenote, “Torts-I may be liable but it's not my fault!: The Wyoming Supreme Court rules that defaulting defendants can now challenge fault. McGarvin-Moberly Constr. Co. v. Welden, 897 P.2d 1310,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1996)

For article, “The Law of Indemnity in Wyoming: Unravelling the Confusion,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 811 (1996).

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update, see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of last clear chance doctrine in comparative negligence case, 59 ALR2d 1261.

Comparative negligence rule where misconduct of 3 or more persons is involved, 8 ALR3d 722.

Comment note on the doctrine of comparative negligence and its relation to the doctrine of contributory negligence, 32 ALR3d 463.

Retrospective application of state statute substituting rule of comparative negligence for that of contributory negligence, 37 ALR3d 1438.

Contribution or indemnity between joint tortfeasors on basis of relative fault, 53 ALR3d 184.

Modern development of comparative negligence doctrine having applicability to negligence actions generally, 78 ALR3d 339.

Judicial adoption of comparative negligence doctrine as applicable retrospectively, 78 ALR3d 421.

Choice of law as to application of comparative negligence doctrine, 86 ALR3d 1206.

Liability of one negligently causing fire for injuries sustained by person other than firefighter, 91 ALR3d 1202.

Automobile occupant's failure to use seat belts as contributory negligence, 92 ALR3d 9.

Liability for injuries in connection with revolving door on nonresidential premises, 93 ALR3d 132.

Nonuse of automobile seat belts as evidence of comparative negligence, 95 ALR3d 239.

Evidence of automobile passenger's blood-alcohol level as admissible in support of defense that passenger was contributorily negligent or assumed risk of automobile accident, 5 ALR4th 1194.

Applicability of comparative negligence doctrine to actions based on strict liability in tort, 9 ALR4th 633.

Effect of adoption of comparative negligence rules on assumption of risk, 16 ALR4th 700.

Effect of plaintiff's comparative negligence in reducing punitive damages recoverable, 27 ALR4th 318.

Liability of operator of grocery store to invitee slipping on spilled liquid or semiliquid substance, 24 ALR4th 696.

Modern trends as to contributory negligence of children, 32 ALR4th 56.

Patient's failure to reveal medical history to physician as contributory negligence or assumption of risk in defense of malpractice action, 33 ALR4th 790.

Tennis club's liability for tennis player's injuries, 52 ALR4th 1253.

Liability to one struck by golf ball, 53 ALR4th 282.

Products liability: sufficiency of evidence to support product misuse defense in actions concerning electrical generation and transmission equipment, 55 ALR4th 1010.

Products liability: sufficiency of evidence to support product misuse defense in actions concerning lawnmowers, 55 ALR4th 1062.

Tort liability for window washer's injury or death, 69 ALR4th 207.

Comparative fault: calculation of net recovery by applying percentage of plaintiff's fault before or after subtracting amount of settlement by less than all joint tortfeasors, 71 ALR4th 1108.

Right of tortfeasor initially causing injury to recover indemnity or contribution from medical attendant aggravating injury or causing new injury in course of treatment, 72 ALR4th 231.

Products liability: contributory negligence or assumption of risk as defense in negligence action based on failure to provide safety device for product causing injury, 75 ALR4th 443.

Products liability: contributory negligence or assumption of risk as defense in action for strict liability or breach of warranty based on failure to provide safety device for product causing injury, 75 ALR4th 538.

Rescue doctrine: applicability and application of comparative negligence principles, 75 ALR4th 875.

Modern status of rule imputing motor vehicle driver's negligence to passenger on joint venture theory, 3 ALR5th 1.

Comparative Negligence: Judgment allocating fault in action against less than all potential defendants as precluding subsequent action against parties not sued in original action, 4 ALR5th 753.

Joint and several liability of physicians whose independent negligence in treatment of patient causes indivisible injury, 9 ALR5th 746.

Sufficiency of evidence to raise last clear chance doctrine in cases of automobile collision with pedestrian or bicyclist—modern cases, 9 ALR5th 826.

Applicability of comparative negligence principles to intentional torts, 18 ALR5th 525.

Applicability of comparative negligence doctrine to actions based on negligent misrepresentation, 22 ALR5th 464.

Liability for injuries to, or death of, water-skiers, 34 ALR5th 77.

Products liability: defective motor vehicle air bag systems, 39 ALR5th 267.

Recovery for emotional distress based on fear of contracting HIV or AIDS, 59 ALR5th 535.

Comparative negligence of driver as defense to enhanced injury, crashworthiness, or second collision claim, 69 ALR5th 625.

Liability of owner, operator, or other parties, for personal injuries allegedly resulting from snow or ice on premises of parking lot, 74 ALR5th 49.

Comparative negligence, contributory negligence and assumption of risk in action against owner of store, office, or similar place of business by invitee falling on tracked-in water or snow, 83 ALR5th 589.

Contributory negligence or comparative negligence based on failure of patient to follow instructions as defense in action against physician or surgeon for medical malpractice, 84 ALR5th 619.

Products liability: Liability of manufacturer, supplier, or seller of passenger or freight elevator, hoist, or elevator component for injury or damage resulting from alleged defect in elevator or component, 117 ALR5th 267.

Applicability of maritime law rule of comparative negligence to strict products liability cases brought in admiralty, 74 ALR Fed 316.